West Virginia, session 2025, SB336.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. Authorization for Department of Homeland Security to promulgate legislative rules. §64-6-1. Governor's Committee on Crime, Delinquency, and Correction. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 9, 2024, authorized under the authority of §15-9B-4 of this code, modified by the Governor's Committee on Crime, Delinquency, and Correction to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 20, 2024, relating to the Governor's Committee on Crime, Delinquency, and Correction (sexual assault forensic examinations, 149 CSR 11), is authorized.